Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.310

Benefits exempt from taxation and legal process—Assignability—Exceptions—Deductions for group insurance premiums or for state patrol memorial foundation contributions.

(1) Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the right of any person to a retirement allowance or optional retirement allowance under the provisions hereof and all moneys and investments and income thereof are exempt from any state, county, municipal, or other local tax and shall not be subject to execution, garnishment, attachment, the operation of bankruptcy or the insolvency laws, or other processes of law whatsoever, whether the same be in actual possession of the person or be deposited or loaned and shall be unassignable except as herein specifically provided.

(2) Subsection (1) of this section shall not prohibit the department of retirement systems from complying with (a) a wage assignment order for child support issued pursuant to chapter 26.18 RCW, (b) an order to withhold and deliver issued pursuant to chapter 74.20A RCW, (c) a notice of payroll deduction issued pursuant to *RCW 26.23.060, (d) a mandatory benefits assignment order issued pursuant to chapter 41.50 RCW, (e) a court order directing the department of retirement systems to pay benefits directly to an obligee under a dissolution order as defined in RCW 41.50.500(3) which fully complies with RCW 41.50.670 and 41.50.700, or (f) any administrative or court order expressly authorized by federal law.

(3) Subsection (1) of this section shall not be deemed to prohibit a beneficiary of a retirement allowance from authorizing deductions therefrom for payment of premiums due on any group insurance policy or plan issued for the benefit of a group comprised of members of the Washington state patrol or other public employees of the state of Washington, or for contributions to the Washington state patrol memorial foundation.

[ 2012 c 159 s 28; 1991 c 365 s 23; 1989 c 360 s 29. Prior: 1987 c 326 s 25; 1987 c 63 s 1; 1982 1st ex.s. c 52 s 31; 1979 ex.s. c 205 s 8; 1977 ex.s. c 256 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.310; prior: 1951 c 140 s 8; 1947 c 250 s 20; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 6362-100.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 26.23.060 was amended by 2021 c 35 s 15, changing "notice of payroll deduction" to "income withholding order."

Severability—1991 c 365: See note following RCW 41.50.500.

Effective date—1987 c 326: See RCW 41.50.901.

Effective dates—1982 1st ex.s. c 52: See note following RCW 2.10.180.